North Carolina statutes. Chapter 116. Higher Education.
Article 2. Western Carolina University, East Carolina University, Appalachian State University, North Carolina Agricultural and Technical State University. [Repealed]

§ 116-45.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1971, c. 1244, s. 1.

§ 116-45.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1969, c. 801, s. 7.

§ 116-45.2.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1969, c. 297, s. 6.

§ 116-46.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1971, c. 1244, s. 1.

§ 116-46.1.
[Repealed]

Transferred to G.S. 116-42.1 by Session Laws 1971, c. 1244, s. 11.

§ 116-46.1A.
[Repealed]

Transferred to G.S. 116-42.2 by Session Laws 1971, c. 1244, s. 11.

§ 116-46.1B.
[Repealed]

Transferred to G.S. 116-42.3 by Session Laws 1971, c. 1244, s. 11.

§ 116-46.2.
[Repealed]

Transferred to

G.S. 116-17

by Session Laws 1971, c. 1244, s. 3.

§§ 116-46.3,
116-46.4.
[Repealed]

Transferred to

G.S. 116-40.3

and 116-40.4 by Session Laws 1971, c. 1244, s. 10.